test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkensimishiniibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkensimishiniibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkensimishiniibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkensimishiniibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkensimishiniibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkensimishiniibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
